Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 2. False Checks, Drafts, or Orders

§ 2311.
Civil remedy for bad checks; damages.

In any action against a person who makes, issues, or draws any check, draft, or order for the payment of money that has been dishonored for lack of funds or credit to pay the same, or because the maker, issuer, or drawer has no account with the drawee, the holder may recover from the maker, issuer, or drawer court costs, costs of service, the amount of the check, draft, or order, bank fees, interest, attorney’s fees, and damages in the amount of $50.00. A holder may only recover attorney’s fees and damages under this section if the holder gives notice pursuant to this section for payment of the check, draft, or order and the maker, issuer, or drawer fails to tender within 30 days of the date of notice an amount equal to the amount of the check, draft, or order, plus bank fees and mailing costs.

As used in this section:

“Dishonored” includes a stop payment order issued without cause.

“Notice” means notice given to the maker, drawer, or issuer of the check, draft, or order in writing. Notice in writing shall include the date the check was written, the person to whom the check was made payable, bank fees, mailing costs, the amount of the check, and the date by which payment should be made. Notice in writing shall be conclusively presumed to have been given:

when properly mailed by certified mail and by first-class mail, addressed to the maker, drawer, or issuer at the address as it appears on the check, draft, or order or at the last known address; or

if:

the notice has been properly mailed by first-class mail addressed to the maker, drawer, or issuer at the address as it appears on the check, draft, or order or at the last known address;

the notice is supported by an affidavit of service by mailing; and

three days have gone by after the date the affidavit is executed.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 23, eff. March 29, 1972;

1971, No. 254

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 11, 1972;

1987, No. 260

(Adj. Sess.);

2005, No. 60

, § 1.

Parties.

Persons who are entitled to take advantage of this section are members of class entitled to be protected by this section, or for the benefit of whom it was intended. Neverett v. Towne, 121 Vt. 447, 159 A.2d 345, 1960 Vt. LEXIS 143 (1960).

§ 2312.
Prima facie evidence of knowledge.

As against the maker or drawer thereof, the making, drawing, uttering, or delivery of such check, draft, or order, the payment of which is refused by the drawee for the reason that the maker or drawer has not sufficient funds in or credit with such bank or other depository for the payment of such check, draft, or order in full upon its presentation, shall be prima facie evidence of knowledge at the time of such making, drawing, uttering, or delivery that the maker or drawer did not have sufficient funds in or credit with such bank or other depository for the payment of such check, draft, or order in full upon its presentation, unless such maker or drawer shall pay such check, draft, or order, with all costs and protest fees, within eight days after receiving notice that the same has not been paid by the drawee.